Vermont, session 2025-2026, S160.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 4022 is amended to read:
§ 4022. BUMP-FIRE STOCKS; MACHINE GUNS; RAPID-FIRE
DEVICES; POSSESSION PROHIBITED
(a) As used in this section,:
(1) “bump-fire stock” “Bump-fire stock” means a butt stock designed to
be attached to a semiautomatic firearm and intended to increase the rate of fire
achievable with the firearm to that of a fully automatic firearm by using the
energy from the recoil of the firearm to generate a reciprocating action that
facilitates the repeated activation of the trigger.
VT LEG #385569 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.160
2026 Page 2 of 3
(2) “Auto sear” means a device, other than a bump stock, designed to
convert a semiautomatic firearm to shoot more than one shot with a single pull
of the trigger without manual reloading.
(3) “Machine gun” means any weapon that shoots, is designed to shoot,
or can be readily restored to shoot automatically more than one shot without
manual reloading, by a single function of the trigger. “Machine gun” also
includes the frame or receiver of any such weapon; any part designed and
intended solely and exclusively, or combination of parts designed and
intended, for use in converting a weapon into a machine gun; and any
combination of parts from which a machine gun can be assembled if the parts
are in the possession or under the control of a person.
(4) “Rapid-fire device” means any device, including an auto sear, that
when installed in or attached to a firearm increases the weapon’s rate of fire or
the rate at which the trigger is activated.
(b) A person shall not possess a bump-fire stock, machine gun, or rapid-fire
device. A person who violates this subsection shall be imprisoned not more
than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.
(c) The Department of Public Safety shall develop, promote, and execute a
collection process that permits persons to voluntarily and anonymously
relinquish bump-fire stocks prior to the effective date of this section October 1,
2018.
VT LEG #385569 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.160
2026 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385569 v.1